src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V2-GEM !V2: palatalized monosyllabic stems; geminate (continuant)
+V+Inf						:%>е 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prs					:%>ей 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt					:%>ма				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%>а 				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%>мэнч 			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prog				:%>мэн				K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Act					:%>ем				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1				:%^WG%>а			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%^WG%>ам			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2				:%^WG%>ак			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%^WG%>ах			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3				:%>0				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1				:%>епь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2				:%>ьбэдтӭ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3				:%>ев				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Ips				:%^WG%>етҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg			:%^WG%>0			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1				:%>е				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%>емь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2				:%>екь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%>ехь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3				:%^WG%>е			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1				:%^WG%>емь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2				:%^WG%>етҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3				:%>енҍ				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Ips				:%>ешь				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg			:%>ма 				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>а 				K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>мэнч 			K 			;
+V							:%^WG%>0			V_COND		;!always C-depal. and V-pal-ablaut?
+V+Imprt+Sg					:%^WG%>0			K 			;
+V+Imprt+Pl					:%>е				K 			;

LEXICON V2-GEM-J !V1: non-palatalized monosyllabic stems; geminate (continuant /j/)
+V+Inf						:%>йе 			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prs					:%>йей 			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt					:%^EAABL%>ййма			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%^EAABL%>йя 			K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial		:%^EAABL%>йймэнч 		K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Prog				:%^EAABL%>йймэн		K 			;
+V+Ptcp+Act					:%>йем			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1				:%^EAABL%>я			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%^EAABL%>ям			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2				:%^EAABL%>як			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%^EAABL%>ях			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3				:%^EAABL%>йй			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1				:%>йепь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2				:%>ййбэдтӭ		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3				:%>йев			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+Ips				:%>етҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg			:%>й			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1				:%>йе			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+Use/Dial		:%>йемь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2				:%>йекь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Use/Dial		:%>йехь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3				:%>е			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1				:%>емь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2				:%>етҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3				:%>йенҍ			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+Ips				:%>йешь			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg			:%>ййма 		K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>йя 			K 			;
+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial	:%>йймэнч 		K 			;
+V							:%>й 			V_COND		;!always C-depal. and V-pal-ablaut?
+V+Imprt+Sg					:%>й			K 			;
+V+Imprt+Pl					:%>йе			K 			;

LEXICON V2 !V2: palatalized monosyllabic stems
+V		:		V2_INF	;
+V		: 		V2_IND	 ;
+V		:		V1|2_IMPRT	;
+V		:%^WG 	V_COND	;!always C-depal. and V-pal-ablaut?

LEXICON VDER1 !label is preliminary, the class comprises all monosyllabic stems derived by a suffix -C- (e.g. -x-, -d-, etc.)
+V		:		VDER1_INF ;
+V		:		VDER1_IND ;
+V		:		VDER1_IMPRT ;
+V		:		V_COND ;

!conditional inflexion is identical for all classes
LEXICON V_COND
+Cond+Sg1			:%>че		K ;
+Cond+Sg2			:%>чекь		K ;
+Cond+Sg2+Use/Dial	:%>чехь		K ;
+Cond+Sg3			:%>аһч		K ;
+Cond+Pl1			:%>чепь		K ;
+Cond+Pl2			:%>чебпе	K ;
+Cond+Pl3			:%>ченҍ		K ;
+Cond+ConNeg		:%>че		K ;

!class V1 non-finite forms
LEXICON V1_INF 
+Inf				:%>э 		K ;
+Ptcp+Prs			:%>эй 		K ;
+Ptcp+Prt			:%>ма 		K ;
+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial	:%>а 		K ;
+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial	:%>мэнч 	K ;
+Ptcp+Prog			:%>мэн		K ;
+Ptcp+Act			:%>эм		K ;

!class V2 non-finite forms
LEXICON V2_INF 
+Inf				:э	K ;
!+Ptcp+Prs			:%>эй 		K ;??
+Ptcp+Prt			:%^CLDPAL%>ма 		K ;
+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial	:%^CLDPAL%>а 		K ;
+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial	:%^CLDPAL%>мэнч 	K ;
!+Ptcp+Prog			:%>мэн		K ;
!+Ptcp+Act			:%>эм		K ;??

!class VDER1 non-finite forms
LEXICON VDER1_INF 
+Inf				:%>э 		K ;
+Ptcp+Prs			:%>эй 		K ;
+Ptcp+Prt			:%>ма 		K ;!??
+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial	:%>а 		K ;!??
+Ptcp+Prt+Use/Dial	:%>мэнч		K ;!??
+Ptcp+Prog			:%>мэн		K ;!??
+Ptcp+Act			:%>эм		K ;

!class V1 imperative forms
LEXICON V1|2_IMPRT
+Imprt+Sg			:%^WG%>0	K ;
+Imprt+Pl			:%>э		K ;

!class VDER1 imperative forms
LEXICON VDER1_IMPRT
+Imprt+Sg			:%>0		K ;!??
+Imprt+Pl			:%>эгке		K ;

!class V1 indicative forms
LEXICON V1_IND 
+Ind		:%^WG	PrsSg1 ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrsSg2 ;
+Ind		:		PrsSg3 ;
+Ind		:		PrsPl1 ;
+Ind		:		PrsPl2 ;
+Ind		:		PrsPl3 ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrsImpers ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrsConNeg ;
+Ind		:%^PAL	PrtSg1 ;
+Ind		:%^PAL	PrtSg2 ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrtSg3 ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrtPl1 ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrtPl2 ;
+Ind		:%^PAL	PrtPl3 ;
+Ind		:		PrtImpers ;
+Ind		:		PrtConNeg ;

!class V2 indicative forms
LEXICON V2_IND 
+Ind		:%^WG%^CLDPAL	PrsSg1 ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrsSg2 ;
+Ind		:%^CLDPAL	PrsSg3 ;
+Ind		:		PrsPl1 ;
+Ind		:		PrsPl2 ;
+Ind		:		PrsPl3 ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrsImpers ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrsConNeg ;
+Ind		:		PrtSg1 ;
+Ind		:		PrtSg2 ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrtSg3 ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrtPl1 ;
+Ind		:%^WG	PrtPl2 ;
+Ind		:		PrtPl3 ;
+Ind		:		PrtImpers ;
+Ind		:%^CLDPAL		PrtConNeg ;

!class VDER1 indicative forms; they don't have stem gradation, palatalization, ablaut
LEXICON VDER1_IND 
+Ind		: PrsSg1 ;
+Ind		: PrsSg2 ;
+Ind		: PrsSg3 ;
+Ind		: PrsPl1 ;
+Ind		: PrsPl2 ;
+Ind		: PrsPl3 ;
+Ind		: PrsImpers ;
+Ind		: PrsConNeg ;
+Ind		: PrtSg1 ;
+Ind		: PrtSg2 ;
+Ind		: PrtSg3 ;
+Ind		: PrtPl1 ;
+Ind		: PrtPl2 ;
+Ind		: PrtPl3 ;
+Ind		: PrtImpers ;
+Ind		: PrtConNeg ;

!the actual suffixes
LEXICON PrsSg1
+Prs+Sg1			:%>а		K ;!always depal.
+Prs+Sg1+Use/Dial	:%>ам		K ;!always depal.

LEXICON PrsSg2
+Prs+Sg2			:%>ак		K ;!always depal.
+Prs+Sg2+Use/Dial	:%>ах		K ;!always depal.

LEXICON PrsSg3
+Prs+Sg3			:%>0		K ;!always depal.

LEXICON PrsPl1
+Prs+Pl1			:%>эпь		K ;

LEXICON PrsPl2
+Prs+Pl2			:%>бэдтӭ	K ;

LEXICON PrsPl3
+Prs+Pl3			:%>эв 		K ;

LEXICON PrsImpers
+Prs+Impers			:%>этҍ		K ;

LEXICON PrsConNeg
+Prs+ConNeg			:%>0		K ;

LEXICON PrtSg1
+Prt+Sg1			:%>э		K ;
+Prt+Sg1+Use/Dial	:%>эмь 		K ;

LEXICON PrtSg2
+Prt+Sg2			:%>экь		K ;
+Prt+Sg2+Use/Dial	:%>эхь 		K ;

LEXICON PrtSg3
+Prt+Sg3			:%>э		K ;

LEXICON PrtPl1
+Prt+Pl1			:%>эмь		K ;

LEXICON PrtPl2
+Prt+Pl2			:%>этҍ 		K ;

LEXICON PrtPl3
+Prt+Pl3			:%>энҍ 		K ;

LEXICON PrtImpers
+Prt+Impers			:%>эшь		K ;

LEXICON PrtConNeg
+Prt+ConNeg			:%>ма		K ;
+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial:%>а	 	K ;
+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial:%>мэнч 	K ;
+Prt+ConNeg+Use/Dial:%>энч	 	K ;


!provisional classes
LEXICON PYJJE !provisional class; !twolc: -э --> -е й _ + йе --> е
+V+Inf:%>е  K ; 
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^WG%>я K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^WG%>як K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Use/Dial:%^WG%>ях K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>0 K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>епь K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>бэдтӭ K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>ев K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Conneg:%^WG%>0 K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>е K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+Use/Dial:%>емь K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>екь K ; !pal
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Use/Dial:%>ехь K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Use/Dial:%>эхь K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^WG%>е K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^WG%>емь K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^WG%>етҍ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>енҍ K ; !pal
+V+Ind+Prt+Conneg:%>ма K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Conneg+Use/Dial:%>я K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Conneg+Use/Dial:%>мэнч K ;
+V+Imprt+Sg:%^WG%>0 K ;
+V+Imprt+Pl:%>е  K ;
+V+Cond: V_COND ;

LEXICON VAANNJCE !class 1: monosyll. pal. stem
+V+Inf:%>э  K ; 
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^CLDPAL%^WG%>а K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^CLDPAL%>0 K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^WG%^CLDPAL%>а K ;
!+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^WG%^CLDPAL%>ак K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>эпь K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Conneg:%^WG%>0 K ;
!+V+Imprt+Sg:%^WG%>0 K ;
!+V+Imprt+Pl:%>э  K ;
+V+Cond: V_COND ;

LEXICON 1
+V+Inf:%>э  # ; 
+V+Ind:  V_IND_EVEN ;
+V+Cond: V_COND ;
+V+Pot:  V_POT ; 
+V+Imprt: V_IMP ;
+V+Ind+Prs+Impers:%>этҍ   # ; !weak grade
+V+Ind+Prt+Impers:%>эшь   # ; 
+V+ConNeg+Prs:%^WG   # ; !Ø-suffix, weak grade
+V+ConNeg+Prt:%>ма   # ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>ма   # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Attr:%>ма%>сь   # ; !?
+V+Ger:%>мэнҍ   # ;
+V+VAbess:%>ханна   # ; !weak grade
+V+VAbess+Attr:%>ханна%>сь   # ; !?

LEXICON 2 
1 ;
LEXICON 3 
1 ;
LEXICON 4 
1 ;
LEXICON 5 
1 ;
LEXICON 6
1 ;
LEXICON 7
1 ;

LEXICON ELAN_V
1 ; ! just dumping the ELAN verbs here

LEXICON OAHPA_V
1 ; ! just dumping the oahpa verbs here

LEXICON PUEDTJE
+V+INF:%>э # ;
+V+Pl1:%>эпь # ;
+V+Conneg+Prs:%^WG%>0 K ;
