src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbstems   !!= * **@CODE@**
пӯлле:пӯлл V2-GEM ;
воаррдэ:воаррд VDER1 ;
вуэйе:вуэ V2-GEM-J "мочь" ;
пуэдтӭ:пуэдтҍ PUEDTJE "come" ;
суввдэ:суввд ELAN_V "дымить / to smoke (of a fire)" ;!looks like V1, but is derivation?
сугклэ:сугкл ELAN_V "начать грести / to begin to row" ;!looks like V1, where first part of cluster is a stop !derivation?
тидтӭ:тидтҍ PUEDTJE "знать" ;
чӯмсэ:чӯмс VDER1 ;
шылле:шылл V2-GEM ;
елле:елл V2-GEM "жить/ to live" ;
аббрэ:аббр 2 "идти - о дожде / to rain" ;
кӯссьхэ:кӯссьх 3 "угощать / to treat to" ;
шурьнэ:шурьн 4 "увеличить / to increase (??vi)" ;
суэлнэ:суэлн 4 "воровать / to steal" ;
сухтэ:сухт 4 "заставить грести / to have someone row" ;
поҏтэ:поҏт 4 "кормить / to feed" ;
ёҏтэ:ёҏт 4 "уронить / to drop" ;
пэӆтэ:пэӆт 4 "пугать / to frighten" ;
аббръэ:аббръ 5 "пойти - о дожде / to begin to rain" ;
а̄ввтлэ:а̄ввтл 5 "погреть / to warm up (??vi)" ;
а̄ррьвдэ:а̄ррьвд 5 "угадать / to guess" ;
кырьйхэ:кырьйх 5 "писать / to write" ;
огкнушшэ:огкнушш 6 "застыдиться / to be ashamed" ;
ро̄бхушшэ:ро̄бхушш 6 "работать / to work" ;
вуаллктэллэ:вуаллктэлл 6 "бросать / to throw" ;
а̄ммьсассьтэ:а̄ммьсассьт 7 "завнуть ?? зевнуть / to yawn" ;
оаввнэннтэ:оаввнэннт 7 "открываться / to open up (vi)" ;
лыһкэ:лыһк ELAN_V ;
моайнсэ:моайнс ELAN_V ;
а̄ннэ:а̄нн OAHPA_V ;
альтнэ:альтн OAHPA_V ;
аппьсе:аппьс OAHPA_V ;
ва̄ннҍцле:ва̄ннҍцл OAHPA_V ;
во̄ссэ:во̄сс OAHPA_V ;
вуайхуввэ:вуайхувв OAHPA_V ;
вуэдтсэллэ:вуэдтсэлл OAHPA_V ;
вуэдҍсуввэ:вуэдҍсувв OAHPA_V ;
вуэпьсе:вуэпьс OAHPA_V ;
вуэсстлэ:вуэсстл OAHPA_V ;
вуэӈӈэ:вуэӈӈ OAHPA_V ;
выййле:выййл OAHPA_V ;
вэ̄йе:вэ̄й OAHPA_V ;
вӣдже:вӣдж OAHPA_V ;
вӯввсэ:вӯввс OAHPA_V ;
вӯзьхэ:вӯзьх OAHPA_V ;
вӯлльке:вӯлльк OAHPA_V ;
е̄ллсуввэ:е̄ллсувв OAHPA_V ;
ка̄рьксэ:ка̄рькс OAHPA_V ;
ка̄ццькэ:ка̄ццьк OAHPA_V ;
карсэ:карс OAHPA_V ;
касснэ:кассн OAHPA_V ;
ке̄ссе:ке̄сс OAHPA_V ;
коа̄ввнэ:коа̄ввн OAHPA_V ;
копчнэдтэ:копчнэдт OAHPA_V ;
куа̄шшкэ:куа̄шшк OAHPA_V ;
кугкхэллэ:кугкхэлл OAHPA_V ;
куллтэллэ:куллтэлл OAHPA_V ;
куххкнэ:куххкн OAHPA_V ;
кыррьтэ:кыррьт OAHPA_V ;
кэ̄бптуввэ:кэ̄бптувв OAHPA_V ;
кэ̄ххче:кэ̄ххч OAHPA_V ;
кӯсстэ:кӯсст OAHPA_V ;
ла̄ввлэ:ла̄ввл OAHPA_V ;
ла̄ндтӭ:ла̄ндт OAHPA_V ;
лаппьсэ:лаппьс OAHPA_V ;
ле̄шшэ:ле̄шш OAHPA_V ;
ло̄дтэ:ло̄дт OAHPA_V ;
луввдэ:луввд OAHPA_V ;
луннтнэ:луннтн OAHPA_V ;
луннцэ:луннц OAHPA_V ;
луэннтэ:луэннт OAHPA_V ;
лыввтъе:лыввтъ OAHPA_V ;
лыххклэ:лыххкл OAHPA_V ;
лӯнтнэ:лӯнтн OAHPA_V ;
ме̄ррьдэ:ме̄ррьд OAHPA_V ;
мешшъе:мешшъ OAHPA_V ;
моаӆӆьчхэ:моаӆӆьчх OAHPA_V ;
мушштсэллэ:мушштсэлл OAHPA_V ;
мушшьтэ:мушшьт OAHPA_V ;
мӣллсуввэ:мӣллсувв OAHPA_V ;
нагьруввэ:нагьрувв OAHPA_V ;
ноа̄йххьтлэдтэ:ноа̄йххьтлэдт OAHPA_V ;
о̄ххпнуввэ:о̄ххпнувв OAHPA_V ;
оа̄ҏҏтэ:оа̄ҏҏт OAHPA_V ;
оаннӭ:оанн OAHPA_V ;
оассэ:оасс OAHPA_V ;
па̄ххкэ:па̄ххк OAHPA_V ;
пайгке:пайгк OAHPA_V ;
пайнэ:пайн OAHPA_V ;
пе̄ррэ:пе̄рр OAHPA_V ;
по̄рсуввэ:по̄рсувв OAHPA_V ;
по̄тткнэ:по̄тткн OAHPA_V ;
по̄ҏтэ:по̄ҏт OAHPA_V ;
поа̄вчсе:поа̄вчс OAHPA_V ;
подтлэ:подтл OAHPA_V ;
пэ̄знэдтэ:пэ̄знэдт OAHPA_V ;
пэ̄рркэ:пэ̄ррк OAHPA_V ;
пэллэ:пэлл OAHPA_V ;
ре̄ввклаххьтэ:ре̄ввклаххьт OAHPA_V ;
рисэвайе:рисэвай OAHPA_V ;
ро̄дтҍе:ро̄дтҍ OAHPA_V ;
рэ̄ӎэдэ:рэ̄ӎэд OAHPA_V ;
са̄рнэшкуэдтӭ:са̄рнэшкуэдт OAHPA_V ;
сугкэ:сугк OAHPA_V ;
суннтэ:суннт OAHPA_V ;
суэӈӈэ:суэӈӈ OAHPA_V ;
ся̄ййве:ся̄ййв OAHPA_V ;
ся̄ӈӈкэ:ся̄ӈӈк OAHPA_V ;
сӣрсэ:сӣрс OAHPA_V ;
та̄йе:та̄й OAHPA_V ;
те̄вьтхэ:те̄вьтх OAHPA_V ;
то̄ӆӆькъе:то̄ӆӆькъ OAHPA_V ;
тубпэ:тубп OAHPA_V ;
тыввнаххьтэ:тыввнаххьт OAHPA_V ;
тыввэ:тывв OAHPA_V ;
тӣввэ:тӣвв OAHPA_V ;
тӣрвсэ:тӣрвс OAHPA_V ;
тӣрвхэ:тӣрвх OAHPA_V ;
тӯллтэ:тӯллт OAHPA_V ;
тӯлльтхэ:тӯлльтх OAHPA_V ;
тӯльтхэ:тӯльтх OAHPA_V ;
угкэ:угк OAHPA_V ;
уййнхуввэ:уййнхувв OAHPA_V ;
хабпхэ:хабпх OAHPA_V ;
хо̄ҏҏкэ:хо̄ҏҏк OAHPA_V ;
ца̄ввьнэ:ца̄ввьн OAHPA_V ;
це̄бпэ:це̄бп OAHPA_V ;
це̄ҏҏтэ:це̄ҏҏт OAHPA_V ;
це̄ӆӆькэ:це̄ӆӆьк OAHPA_V ;
цыррьке:цыррьк OAHPA_V ;
чиннэ:чинн OAHPA_V ;
чуэннчле:чуэннчл OAHPA_V ;
шэ̄ннтътэ:шэ̄ннтът OAHPA_V ;
ыбе:ыб OAHPA_V ;
ышштэ:ышшт OAHPA_V ;
эӆпсэ:эӆпс OAHPA_V ;
югкэ:югк OAHPA_V ;
юхтэ:юхт OAHPA_V ;
ёадтӭ:ёадт OAHPA_V ;
ӣӈкхувнэ:ӣӈкхувн OAHPA_V ;
